Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.010

Establishment.

Each county with a population of eight thousand or more shall have a county law library, which shall be governed and maintained as hereinafter provided.

[ 1992 c 62 s 1; 1919 c 84 s 1; RRS s 8247.]